Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1592
Person, defined.

Person shall mean any individual, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, firm, association, joint venture, trust, estate, public or private institution, group, public agency, political subdivision of this state, any other state or political subdivision or agency thereof, and any legal successor, representative, agent, or agency of the foregoing, but shall not include federal governmental agencies.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 15;

Laws 1987, LB 426, § 8;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 541.